dictionaries/ro-ro.dic
abstras/G
abÈ›inut/G
ademenesc/I
admis/G
adus/G
afanisesc/I
aghesmuiesc/I
ajuns/G
alcÄƒtuiesc/I
ales/G
alÄƒmesc/I
amuÈ›esc/I
antepus/G
aparÈ›inut/G
apostolesc/I
aprins/G
apus/G
arendÄƒÈ™esc/I
arhieresc/I
ars/G
arvonesc/I
ascuns/G
aservesc/I
atins/G
atras/G
autoamÄƒgesc/I
autodistrus/G
autoservesc/I
aÈ™ternut/G
batjocoresc/I
beÈ™telesc/I
biruiesc/I
blodogoresc/I
bocÄƒiesc/I
bolbocesc/I
bolÃ¢nzesc/I
bortesc/I
boÈ›esc/I
bruftuiesc/I
bucheresc/I
buhÄƒiesc/I
bulucesc/I
burlÄƒcesc/I
buÈ™esc/I
bÄƒdÄƒrÄƒnesc/I
bÄƒltÄƒcÄƒiesc/I
bÄƒnesc/I
bÄƒsnesc/I
calicesc/I
cartiruiesc/I
cehesc/I
cernesc/I
cernut/G
chefÄƒluiesc/I
chezÄƒÈ™uiesc/I
chiotesc/I
chiÈ›Äƒiesc/I
ciobotÄƒresc/I
ciondÄƒnesc/I
cisluiesc/I
ciumbresc/I
clintesc/I
clopoÈ›esc/I
clÄƒmpÄƒnesc/I
coceancÄƒpresc/I
codÄƒlbesc/I
comis/G
complinesc/I
compus/G
conceput/G
condus/G
constituiesc/I
constrÃ¢ns/G
contraputs/G
contrazis/G
convins/G
convorbesc/I
conÈ›inut/G
corcesc/I
corespuns/G
cositoresc/I
cotorosesc/I
coÈ™esc/I
croncÄƒiesc/I
crÄƒiesc/I
cufuresc/I
cules/G
cuprins/G
curs/G
curvÄƒsÄƒresc/I
cÃ¢rciumÄƒresc/I
cÃ¢rpÄƒcesc/I
cÄƒlesc/I
cÄƒnesc/I
cÄƒrturÄƒresc/I
cÄƒtrÄƒnesc/I
datoresc/I
decis/G
decurs/G
dedus/G
demis/G
depins/G
deplÃ¢ns/G
deprins/G
depus/G
depÄƒÈ™esc/I
deschis/G
descins/G
descompus/G
descotoÈ™mÄƒnesc/I
desluÈ™esc/I
desprins/G
despriponesc/I
despÄƒrÈ›it/GO
destÄƒinuiesc/I
dezamÄƒgesc/I
dezgrÄƒdesc/I
dezis/G
dezmoÈ™tenesc/I
dezvinovÄƒÈ›esc/I
deÈ›inut/G
dichisesc/I
discernut/G
disjuns/G
dispus/G
distins/G
distras/G
distrus/G
doctoricesc/I
domesticesc/I
doresc/I
dres/G
drÃ¢ngÄƒnesc/I
duelgesc/I
dumnezeiesc/I
dus/G
dÄƒruiesc/I
egumenesc/I
emers/G
emis/G
exclus/G
expus/G
fecioresc/I
fermecÄƒtoresc/I
fiert/G
fituiesc/I
flÄƒmÃ¢nzesc/I
foÈ™Äƒiesc/I
fript/G
frÃ¢nt/G
fuguiesc/I
fÃ¢stÃ¢cesc/I
fÄƒÈ›uiesc/I
gheboÈ™esc/I
ghintuiesc/I
globesc/I
gomonesc/I
grotesc/I
gugiulesc/I
gÃ¢rbovesc/I
gÄƒlbinesc/I
haiducesc/I
hicÄƒiesc/I
hohotesc/I
horesc/I
hrentuiesc/I
hulesc/I
hÃ¢iesc/I
hÃ¢È™Ã¢iesc/I
hÄƒituiesc/I
hÄƒrhÄƒtesc/I
hÄƒrÄƒÈ›esc/I
hÄƒulesc/I
iezesc/I
impus/G
inclus/G
indispus/G
indus/G
inflipt/G
interpus/G
interzis/G
introdus/G
intuiesc/I
iscÄƒlesc/I
istovesc/I
izbucnesc/I
izvorÄƒsc/I
jicnesc/I
jintuiesc/I
jupesc/I
justapus/G
legiuiesc/I
lenevesc/I
leÈ™uiesc/I
linguÈ™esc/I
lins/G
locuiesc/I
lupesc/I
lÄƒfÄƒiesc/I
lÄƒutÄƒresc/I
mahalagesc/I
marghiolesc/I
matosesc/I
meitÄƒtÄƒresc/I
menÈ›inut/G
metaforicesc/I
meÈ™teÈ™ugÄƒresc/I
milostivesc/I
mitocÄƒnesc/I
mocoÈ™esc/I
moldovenesc/I
morcovporcesc/I
moschicesc/I
moÈ™cotesc/I
moÈ™tenesc/I
muls/G
mulÈ›umesc/I
muscÄƒlesc/I
muÈ™truluiesc/I
mÃ¢njesc/I
mÄƒcelÄƒresc/I
mÄƒldÄƒresc/I
mÄƒrturisesc/I
mÄƒtÄƒhÄƒiesc/I
necÄƒjesc/I
neliniÈ™tesc/I
neodihnesc/I
nevoiesc/I
nins/G
novÄƒcesc/I
nÄƒclÄƒiesc/I
nÄƒpustesc/I
nÄƒtÃ¢ngesc/I
obidesc/I
obrintesc/I
obÈ›inut/G
ocrotesc/I
oferit/GO
ofiÈ›eresc/I
oloiesc/I
omis/G
opresc/I
opus/G
ortomÄƒnesc/I
ostoiesc/I
otÃ¢njesc/I
oÈ›ÄƒrÄƒsc/I
papistÄƒÈ™esc/I
parcurs/G
parigorisesc/I
pedepsesc/I
perceput/G
permis/G
persesc/I
pescÄƒresc/I
petrecut/G
picotesc/I
pionieresc/I
pisÄƒgesc/I
planisesc/I
pleÈ™cuiesc/I
pliscpÄƒsÄƒresc/I
plutuiesc/I
plÃ¢ns/G
pocesc/I
poeticesc/I
politicesc/I
pomÄƒzuiesc/I
porcÄƒiesc/I
pospÄƒiesc/I
potricÄƒlesc/I
preamÄƒresc/I
predispus/G
prelins/G
prelungesc/I
presupus/G
pretins/G
prezis/G
preÃ®ncÄƒlzesc/I
priceput/G
pricinuiesc/I
prigoresc/I
primis/G
prins/G
pripesc/I
probozesc/I
produs/G
prohorisesc/I
promis/G
propus/G
proscomidesc/I
prufnesc/I
prÃ¢nzesc/I
prÄƒznuiesc/I
pungÄƒÈ™esc/I
pus/G
puÈ™cÄƒresc/I
pÃ¢rpÄƒlesc/I
pÄƒduresc/I
pÄƒmÃ¢ntenesc/I
pÄƒrtinesc/I
pÄƒsÄƒresc/I
pÄƒtruns/G
rablagesc/I
reaerisesc/I
reaÈ›intesc/I
refÄƒcut/G
respins/G
rifluiesc/I
rocoÈ™esc/I
rosienesc/I
rudesc/I
runculesc/I
rupt/G
rÃ¢nduiesc/I
rÃ¢s/G
rÄƒbufnesc/I
rÄƒgut/G
rÄƒmas/G
rÄƒmÄƒÈ™esc/I
rÄƒpus/G
rÄƒsfoiesc/I
rÄƒsfrÃ¢nt/G
rÄƒspuns/G
rÄƒstocesc/I
rÄƒsÃ®nÈ›eles/G
rÄƒzbesc/I
rÄƒzluÈ™esc/I
rÄƒzÄƒÈ™esc/I
sastisesc/I
schimnicesc/I
scobesc/I
scorojesc/I
scos/G
scrintesc/I
scurs/G
scÃ¢rbesc/I
sedus/G
semuiesc/I
sfetesc/I
sfÃ¢rlogesc/I
sihÄƒstricesc/I
simÈ›it/GO
sinilesc/I
slobozesc/I
slÄƒbÄƒnogesc/I
smotocesc/I
smuls/G
snopesc/I
solesc/I
soÈ›iesc/I
spilcuiesc/I
sprÄƒhuiesc/I
spus/G
spÄƒÈ™esc/I
stingheresc/I
streÈ™inesc/I
strungÄƒresc/I
strÃ¢ns/G
strÄƒpuns/G
studenÈ›esc/I
stÄƒpÃ¢nesc/I
subjugat/G
sucesc/I
suprafiresc/I
supraprodus/G
suprapus/G
supt/G
supus/G
surchidesc/I
sustras/G
susÈ›inut/G
sÃ¢rguiesc/I
sÄƒrÄƒcesc/I
tencuiesc/I
teÈ™esc/I
tineresc/I
tiuiesc/I
tolÄƒnesc/I
tradus/G
transmis/G
transpus/G
tras/G
trebÄƒluiesc/I
trecut/G
trimis/G
trÃ¢ntoresc/I
tÃ¢nguiesc/I
tÄƒifÄƒsuiesc/I
tÄƒuiesc/I
unguresc/I
uns/G
urzesc/I
veselesc/I
voinicesc/I
vrÄƒjmÄƒÈ™esc/I
vÄƒdesc/I
zalisesc/I
zburÄƒtÄƒcesc/I
zdrÄƒvuiesc/I
zgÃ¢ncilesc/I
zis/G
zogonesc/I
zviduiesc/I
zÄƒgÄƒzuiesc/I
zÄƒpsesc/I
Ã®mblÃ¢nzesc/I
Ã®mbÃ¢csesc/I
Ã®mpins/G
Ã®mpuns/G
Ã®mpupesc/I
Ã®nalbÄƒstresc/I
Ã®nceput/G
Ã®nchis/G
Ã®ncins/G
Ã®ncropesc/I
Ã®ndosesc/I
Ã®nfipt/G
Ã®nfrÃ¢nt/G
Ã®nfrÄƒÈ›esc/I
Ã®njumÄƒtÄƒÈ›esc/I
Ã®nnÄƒrÄƒvesc/I
Ã®nteÈ›esc/I
Ã®ntins/G
Ã®ntrecut/G
Ã®ntrerupt/G
Ã®ntreÈ›inut/G
Ã®nvesc/I
Ã®nvins/G
Ã®nvÄƒlÄƒtucesc/I
Ã®nÈ™omoltocesc/I
Ã®nÈ›eles/G
È™fichiuiesc/I
È™oimÄƒnesc/I
È™perÈ›uiesc/I
È™ters/G
È™trecuiesc/I
È™uÈ™Äƒlesc/I
È›esut/G
È›inut/G
È›opÃ¢rlÄƒnesc/I
È›Äƒrcuiesc/I
